test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kommwq11_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kommõq: # Noun (11) kommõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kommõq+N+Sg+Nom: kommõq
     kommõq+N+Sg+Gen: kombõ
     kommõq+N+Sg+Par: kommõt
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ill: [kombõhe, kombõdõ]
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ine: [kombõn, kombõh, kombõhn]
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ela: kombõst
     kommõq+N+Sg+All: kombõlõ
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ade: kombõl
     kommõq+N+Sg+Abl: kombõlt
     kommõq+N+Sg+Tra: kombõs
     kommõq+N+Sg+Ter: kombõniq
     kommõq+N+Sg+Abe: kombõldaq
     kommõq+N+Sg+Com: kombõgaq
     kommõq+N+Pl+Nom: kombõq
     kommõq+N+Pl+Gen: [kombidõ, kombiidõ, kommõtõ]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Par: [kombit, kombiid]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ill: [kombihe, kombiihe, kombidõ, kombiidõ, kommõtõhe, kommõtõdõ]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ine: [kombin, kombiin, kombih, kombiih, kombihn, kombiihn, kommõtõn, kommõtõh, kommõtõhn]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ela: [kombist, kombiist, kommõtõst]
     kommõq+N+Pl+All: [kombilõ, kombiilõ, kommõtõlõ]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ade: [kombil, kombiil, kommõtõl]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Abl: [kombilt, kombiilt, kommõtõlt]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Tra: [kombis, kombiis, kommõtõs]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Ter: [kombiniq, kombiiniq, kommõtõniq]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Abe: [kombildaq, kombiildaq, kommõtõldaq]
     kommõq+N+Pl+Com: [kombidõgaq, kombiidõgaq, kommõtõgaq]
